Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 96.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8232
Trauma, defined.

Trauma means a single-system or multisystem injury requiring immediate medical or surgical intervention or treatment to prevent death or permanent disability.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 32;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 96.
August 30, 2009